Utah statutes.
48-2a-1002 (Repealed 07/01/13).   Proper plaintiff.

In a derivative action, the plaintiff must be a partner at the time of bringing the action and:

(1)  must have been a partner at the time of the transaction of which he complains; or

(2)  his status as a partner must have devolved upon him by operation of law or pursuant to the terms of the partnership agreement from a person who was a partner at the time of the transaction.



Amended by Chapter 189, 1991 General Session 

Repealed by Chapter 353, 2011 General Session

